Nevada, session 83, AB224-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 281.129 is hereby amended to read as follows:
281.129 1. Any officer of the State, except the Legislative
Fiscal Officer, who disburses money in payment of salaries and
wages of officers and employees of the State:
(a) May, upon written requests of the officer or employee
specifying amounts, withhold those amounts and pay them to:
(1) Charitable organizations;
(2) Employee credit unions;
(3) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), insurers;
(4) The United States for the purchase of savings bonds and
similar obligations of the United States; and
(5) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 288.545 [,] and
section 22 of this act, employee organizations , [and] labor
organizations [.] and professional organizations.
(b) May, in accordance with an agreement entered into pursuant
to NRS 701A.450 between the Director of the Office of Energy and
the officer or employee specifying amounts, withhold those amounts
and pay them to the Director of the Office of Energy for credit to the
Renewable Energy Account created by NRS 701A.450.
(c) Shall, upon receipt of information from the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program specifying amounts of premiums or
contributions for coverage by the Program, withhold those amounts
from the salaries or wages of officers and employees who
participate in the Program and pay those amounts to the Program.
2. The State Controller may adopt regulations necessary to
withhold money from the salaries or wages of officers and
employees of the Executive Department.
Sec. 2. NRS 281.755 is hereby amended to read as follows:
281.755 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
5, a public body shall provide an employee who is the mother of a
child under 1 year of age with:
(a) Reasonable break time, with or without compensation, for
the employee to express breast milk as needed; and
-
*AB224_R2*

– 5 –
(b) A place, other than a bathroom, that is reasonably free from
dirt or pollution, protected from the view of others and free from
intrusion by others where the employee may express breast milk.
2. If the public body determines that complying with the
provisions of subsection 1 will cause an undue hardship considering
the size, financial resources, nature and structure of the public body,
the public body may meet with the employee to agree upon a
reasonable alternative. If the parties are not able to reach an
agreement, the public body may require the employee to accept a
reasonable alternative selected by the public body and the employee
may appeal the decision by filing a complaint in the manner set
forth in subsection 4.
3. An officer or agent of a public body shall not retaliate, or
direct or encourage another person to retaliate, against an employee
of the public body because the employee has:
(a) Taken break time or used the space provided pursuant to
subsection 1 or 2 to express breast milk; or
(b) Taken any action to require the public body to comply with
the requirements of this section, including, without limitation, filing
a complaint, testifying, assisting or participating in any manner in an
investigation, proceeding or hearing to enforce the provisions of this
section.
4. An employee who is aggrieved by the failure of a public
body to comply with the provisions of this section may:
(a) If the employee is employed by the Executive Department of
State Government, is not an employee of an entity described in NRS
284.013 and is not an employee in a bargaining unit pursuant to
NRS 288.400 to 288.630, inclusive, or sections 6 to 52, inclusive,
of this act, file a complaint with the Employee-Management
Committee in accordance with the procedures provided pursuant to
NRS 284.384;
(b) If the employee is employed by the Legislative Department
of State Government, file a complaint with the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau;
(c) If the employee is employed by the Judicial Department of
State Government, file a complaint with the Court Administrator;
and
(d) If the employee is employed by a political subdivision of this
State or any public or quasi-public corporation organized under the
laws of this State or if the employee is employed by the Executive
Department of State Government and is an employee in a bargaining
unit pursuant to NRS 288.400 to 288.630, inclusive, or sections 6 to
52, inclusive, of this act, file a complaint with the Government
Employee-Management Relations Board in the manner set forth in
NRS 288.115.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 6 –
5. The requirements of this section do not apply to the
Department of Corrections. The Department is encouraged to
comply with the provisions of this section to the extent practicable.
6. As used in this section, “public body” means:
(a) The State of Nevada, or any agency, instrumentality or
corporation thereof;
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education; or
(c) Any political subdivision of this State or any public or quasi-
public corporation organized under the laws of this State, including,
without limitation, counties, cities, unincorporated towns, school
districts, charter schools, hospital districts, irrigation districts and
other special districts.
Sec. 3. Chapter 288 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 4 to 52, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 4. “Professional organization” means an organization
of any kind that:
1. Has, as one of its purposes, the improvement of the terms
and conditions of employment of professional employees, as
defined in section 13 of this act; and
2. Provides the service of representation to professional
employees, including, without limitation, in collective bargaining
with state professional employers.
Sec. 5. “State professional employer” means a board,
commission or similar body within the Executive Department,
including, without limitation, the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada on behalf of the Nevada System of Higher
Education, that employs 400 or more professional employees as
defined in section 13 of this act.
Sec. 6. As used in sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 7 to 16, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 7. “Arbitration” means a process of dispute resolution
in which the parties involved in an impasse or grievance submit
their dispute to a third party for a final and binding decision.
Sec. 8. “Bargaining unit” means a group of professional
employees recognized by a state professional employer as having
sufficient community of interest for representation by a
professional organization for the purpose of collective bargaining.
Sec. 9. “Confidential employee” means an employee who
provides administrative support to an employee who assists in the
formulation, determination and effectuation of managerial
personnel policies concerning collective bargaining.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 7 –
Sec. 10. “Exclusive representative” means a professional
organization that, as a result of its designation as such by the
Board, has the exclusive right to:
1. Represent all the professional employees within a
bargaining unit; and
2. Engage in collective bargaining with a state professional
employer pursuant to sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act
concerning wages, hours and other terms and conditions of
employment for those professional employees.
Sec. 11. “Grievance” means an act, omission or occurrence
that a professional employee or an exclusive representative
believes to be an injustice relating to any condition arising out of
the relationship between a state professional employer and a
professional employee, including, without limitation, working
hours, working conditions, membership in a professional
organization or the interpretation of any law, regulation or
agreement.
Sec. 12. 1. “Managerial employee” means an employee
whose primary function is to administer and control the business
of any state professional employer and who is vested with
discretion and independent judgment with regard to the general
conduct and control of the state professional employer.
2. The term includes, without limitation:
(a) A chief administrative officer, the chief administrative
officer’s deputy and immediate assistants, department heads and
their deputies and immediate assistants, appointed officials and
others who are primarily responsible for formulating
and administering management policies and programs;
(b) Administrators of an academic institution, including,
without limitation:
(1) Chancellors, presidents, provosts and deans;
(2) Vice, associate and assistant chancellors, presidents,
provosts and deans; and
(3) Other employees who are primarily responsible for
formulating and administering management policies and
programs; and
(c) Attorneys who serve a state professional employer or advise
other managerial employees.
3. With respect to professional employees of an academic
institution:
(a) A professional employee shall not be deemed a managerial
employee solely because the professional employee participates in
decisions with respect to courses, curriculum, personnel or other
matters of educational policy through shared governance
mechanisms or peer review.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 8 –
(b) A chair or head of a department or similar academic unit
or program who performs the duties described in paragraph (a)
primarily on behalf of the members of the academic unit or
program shall not be deemed a managerial employee solely
because of those duties.
Sec. 13. 1. “Professional employee” means a person who is
employed by a state professional employer and:
(a) Is in the unclassified service of the State; or
(b) Is paid in accordance with any arrangement other than the
pay plan for the classified service of the State.
2. The term does not include:
(a) A local government employee;
(b) A person who is employed in the classified service of the
State pursuant to chapter 284 of NRS;
(c) A person who is employed by the Nevada System of Higher
Education:
(1) In the classified service of the State; or
(2) Who is required to be paid in accordance with the pay
plan for the classified service of the State;
(d) A person employed by the Public Employees’ Retirement
System who is required to be paid in accordance with the pay plan
for the classified service of the State;
(e) An elected official or any person appointed to fill a vacancy
in an elected office;
(f) A person who is employed in neither the classified nor the
unclassified service of the State pursuant to NRS 223.085;
(g) A person whose employment is the result of an
appointment by the Governor to a position which deems the person
to be a civil officer of the State pursuant to NRS 232A.030 or
616C.340;
(h) A managerial employee;
(i) A confidential employee;
(j) A temporary, intermittent or seasonal worker who is
employed for less than 90 calendar days in a period of 365
calendar days;
(k) A commissioned officer or an enlisted member of the
Nevada National Guard; or
(l) A person who is employed within the office of a statewide
elected constitutional officer.
Sec. 14. “Recognition” or “recognized” means the formal
acknowledgment by a state professional employer that a particular
professional organization has the right to represent professional
employees of the state professional employer.
Sec. 15. “Showing of interest” means written or electronic
documentation that provides evidence of the membership of a
-
*AB224_R2*

– 9 –
professional employee in or his or her support for a professional
organization for the purpose of exclusive representation. The term
includes any electronic signature pursuant to chapter 719 of NRS.
Sec. 16. 1. “Supervisory employee” means a person who
does not have the responsibility for the general conduct and
control of a state professional employer, but who:
(a) Performs management duties, including, without
limitation:
(1) Establishing performance standards for subordinate
employees;
(2) Scheduling, assigning, overseeing or reviewing the work
of subordinate employees under established performance
standards; or
(3) Effectively recommending the performance of the duties
described in subparagraphs (1) and (2) and the manner in which
such duties are performed; or
(b) Has the authority to adjust grievances, apply established
personnel policies and procedures, enforce the provisions of a
collective bargaining agreement or effectively recommend such
action,
 if the exercise of the duties or authority described in paragraph
(a) or (b) is not of a merely routine or clerical nature but requires
the use of independent judgment and occupies a regular and
significant portion of the employee’s workday.
2. With respect to professional employees of an academic
institution:
(a) A professional employee shall not be deemed to be a
supervisory employee solely because the professional employee
participates in decisions with respect to courses, curriculum,
personnel or other matters of educational policy through shared
governance mechanisms or peer review.
(b) A chair or head of a department or similar academic unit
or program who performs the duties described in paragraph (a)
primarily on behalf of the members of the academic unit or
program shall not be deemed a supervisory employee solely
because of those duties.
Sec. 17. 1. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that
there is a great need to:
(a) Promote harmonious and constructive relations between
state professional employers and their professional employees;
and
(b) Increase the efficiency of state professional employers.
2. It is therefore in the public interest that the Legislature
enact provisions:
-
*AB224_R2*

– 10 –
(a) Granting certain professional employees the right to
associate with others in organizing and choosing exclusive
representatives for the purpose of engaging in collective
bargaining;
(b) Requiring state professional employers to recognize
professional organizations and to negotiate wages, hours and
other terms and conditions of employment with exclusive
representatives and to enter into written agreements evidencing
the result of collective bargaining; and
(c) Establishing standards and procedures that protect the
rights of professional employees, state professional employers and
the people of the State.
3. The Legislature further finds and declares that:
(a) Joint decision making and consultation between
administration and faculty or academic professional employees is
a long-accepted manner of shared governance in institutions of
higher education and is essential to the advancement of the
educational missions of those institutions;
(b) It is a purpose of sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act to
preserve and encourage the practice and mechanisms of shared
governance with respect to professional employees of public
institutions of higher education in this State; and
(c) The provisions of sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act are
not intended to restrict, limit or prohibit the full exercise of the
functions of faculty in any shared governance mechanism or
practice, including, without limitation, the establishment and
function of faculty senates and the principle of peer review in the
appointment, retention and tenure of faculty in an institution of
higher education.
Sec. 18. 1. For the purposes of collective bargaining and
other mutual aid or protection, every professional employee has
the right to:
(a) Organize, form, join and assist professional organizations,
engage in collective bargaining through exclusive representatives
and engage in other concerted activities; and
(b) Refrain from engaging in such an activity.
2. A state professional employer shall not discriminate in any
way among its professional employees on account of membership
or nonmembership in a professional organization.
3. Professional employees have the right to communicate
with one another and with representatives of professional
organizations concerning organization, representation, issues in
the workplace, collective bargaining and the business and
programs of a professional organization, including, without
limitation, communicating by means of electronic mail, text
-
*AB224_R2*

– 11 –
messages and other electronic communications, telephone, paper
documents and other means of communications of the workplace
subject to the reasonable regulations of a state professional
employer or such limitations as may be set forth in a collective
bargaining agreement.
Sec. 19. 1. A state professional employer shall recognize a
professional organization that presents to the state professional
employer:
(a) A copy of the bylaws, charter or constitution of the
professional organization, which demonstrates that the
organization has as one of its purposes the improvement of
the terms and conditions of employment of professional
employees;
(b) A roster of its officers, if any, and representatives; and
(c) An identification of the professional employees that the
professional organization seeks to represent.
2. If a state professional employer first receives the written
permission of the Board, the state professional employer may
withdraw recognition from a professional organization that fails
to:
(a) Present a copy of each change in its bylaws, charter or
constitution, if any; or
(b) Give notice of any change in the roster of its officers and
representatives, if any.
Sec. 20. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2
and subject to such reasonable regulations as a state professional
employer may prescribe or such conditions and limitations as may
be set forth in a collective bargaining agreement, a professional
organization that has been recognized shall have the right to:
(a) At reasonable times, access areas in which professional
employees work;
(b) Use bulletin boards, mailboxes, electronic mail and other
means of communication to communicate with professional
employees at their workplace;
(c) At reasonable times, use the facilities of a workplace for the
purpose of meetings concerned with the exercise of any rights
guaranteed under the provisions of sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of
this act; and
(d) Provide information to professional employees during the
orientation or on-boarding of new employees.
2. If a professional organization has been designated as the
exclusive representative of a bargaining unit, no professional
organization other than the professional organization designated
as the exclusive representative may exercise the rights set forth in
subsection 1 with respect to professional employees in the
-
*AB224_R2*

– 12 –
bargaining unit except to the extent that such access is otherwise
provided to the general public.
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 22. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, an
officer of a state professional employer shall, upon written
authorization by a professional employee, withhold a sufficient
amount of money from the salary or wages of the employee
pursuant to NRS 281.129 to pay dues or similar fees to a
recognized professional organization.
2. If applicable, a written authorization provided pursuant to
subsection 1 must comply with the provisions of chapter 719 of
NRS.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a written
authorization provided pursuant to subsection 1 is binding for the
period specified in the authorization. An authorization may be
revoked by the professional employee by notifying the professional
organization in accordance with the terms of the authorization.
The professional organization shall process a revocation of an
authorization in a timely manner.
4. If the Board designates a professional organization as the
exclusive representative of a bargaining unit pursuant to sections
6 to 52, inclusive, of this act, an officer of a state professional
employer shall not, pursuant to NRS 281.129, withhold any
amount of money from the salary or wages of a professional
employee within the bargaining unit to pay dues or similar fees to
a professional organization other than the professional
organization that is the exclusive representative of the bargaining
unit.
Sec. 23. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
recognized professional organization may represent a professional
employee of a state professional employer that has recognized the
professional organization with respect to any condition of the
employment of the professional employee, including, without
limitation, representation in disciplinary proceedings and
investigations and proceedings for the adjustment of grievances,
regardless of whether the professional employee is a member of
the professional organization.
2. If a professional employee is in a bargaining unit that has
an exclusive representative, no professional organization other
than the professional organization designated as the exclusive
representative for the bargaining unit may represent the
professional employee.
3. Only the professional organization which has been
designated by the Board as the exclusive representative of a
bargaining unit pursuant to sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act
-
*AB224_R2*

– 13 –
may engage in collective bargaining on behalf of the professional
employees of that bargaining unit.
Sec. 24. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
recognition of a professional organization or the designation of a
professional organization as an exclusive representative does not
preclude a professional employee from acting for himself or
herself with respect to any condition of his or her employment.
Such a professional employee has the right to present grievances
to a state professional employer at any time and to have those
grievances adjusted.
2. If a professional employee, acting for himself or herself,
presents a grievance to a state professional employer pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) Any action taken in the adjustment of a grievance must be
consistent with the terms of an applicable collective bargaining
agreement in effect, if any; and
(b) If the professional employee is in a bargaining unit that
has an exclusive representative, the exclusive representative must
be given an opportunity to be present at any meetings or hearings
related to the adjustment of the grievance and be provided a copy
of the adjustment of the grievance.
Sec. 25. 1. Subject to the conditions imposed by section 23
of this act and any other conditions and limitations as may be set
forth in a collective bargaining agreement, a professional
employee who:
(a) Is the subject of an internal administrative investigation
that could lead to dismissal, involuntary demotion, suspension,
reduction of pay, payment of restitution or other similar adverse
employment action against the professional employee; or
(b) During any questioning by a state professional employer,
reasonably believes that the questioning could lead to the
consequences set forth in paragraph (a),
 must be afforded the right to have a lawyer or other
representative of the professional employee’s choosing present
with the professional employee unless the professional employee
waives, in writing, his or her right to be represented.
2. A state professional employer must not retaliate in any way
against a professional employee for asserting his or her rights
under subsection 1.
Sec. 26. 1. Each state professional employer which has
recognized a professional organization shall determine, in
consultation with the recognized organization, which group or
groups of its professional employees constitute an appropriate
bargaining unit or bargaining units. The primary criterion for that
determination must be the community of interest among the
-
*AB224_R2*

– 14 –
employees concerned. Without restricting the rights of the parties
to make their determination pursuant to this subsection, for the
Nevada System of Higher Education, there is a presumption that
the contact, interests and working conditions of employees within
a branch university, college or other branch create a sufficient
community of interest.
2. Managerial employees must be excluded from any
bargaining unit.
3. Confidential employees must be excluded from any
bargaining unit but are entitled to participate in any plan to
provide benefits for a group that is administered by the bargaining
unit of which they would otherwise be a member.
4. A supervisory employee must not be a member of the same
bargaining unit as the professional employees under the
supervision of the supervisory employee. Any dispute between the
parties as to whether a professional employee is a supervisor must
be submitted to the Board. A professional organization which is
negotiating on behalf of two or more bargaining units may select
members of each unit to negotiate jointly on behalf of each other,
even if one of the units consists of supervisory employees and the
other unit does not.
5. If any professional organization is aggrieved by the
determination of a bargaining unit, it may appeal to the Board.
Subject to judicial review, the decision of the Board is binding
upon the state professional employer and any professional
organization involved. The Board shall apply the same criterion as
specified in subsection 1.
Sec. 27. If no professional organization is designated as the
exclusive representative of a bargaining unit and a recognized
professional organization files with the Board a showing of
interest for the professional organization by more than 50 percent
of the professional employees in a bargaining unit which is
verified by the Board pursuant to section 29 of this act, the Board
shall designate the professional organization as the exclusive
representative of the bargaining unit without ordering an election.
Sec. 28. 1. If no professional organization is designated as
the exclusive representative of a bargaining unit, the Board shall
order an election to be conducted within the bargaining unit if:
(a) A recognized professional organization files with the Board
a written request for an election which includes a showing of
interest for the professional organization by at least 30 percent but
not more than 50 percent of the professional employees within the
bargaining unit which is verified by the Board pursuant to section
29 of this act; and
-
*AB224_R2*

– 15 –
(b) No other election to choose, change or discontinue
exclusive representation has been conducted within the
bargaining unit during the immediately preceding 12 months.
2. If the Board has designated a professional organization as
the exclusive representative of a bargaining unit following an
election pursuant to subsection 1 or without an election pursuant
to section 27 of this act, the Board shall order an election:
(a) If:
(1) Another recognized professional organization files with
the Board a written request for an election which includes a
showing of interest for the professional organization by more than
50 percent of the professional employees within the bargaining
unit; or
(2) A group of professional employees within the
bargaining unit files with the Board a written request for an
election which includes a petition or other evidence showing that
more than 50 percent of the professional employees within the
bargaining unit have requested that an election be conducted to
change or discontinue exclusive representation;
(b) If applicable, the written request filed pursuant to
paragraph (a) is filed at least 225 calendar days but not more than
270 calendar days before the date on which the current collective
bargaining agreement in effect for the bargaining unit expires;
and
(c) If no other election to choose, change or discontinue
exclusive representation has been conducted within the
bargaining unit during the immediately preceding 12 months.
Sec. 29. 1. The Board shall verify each showing of interest
filed by a professional organization pursuant to section 27 or 28 of
this act and the identity of each professional employee identified in
a written request filed by a group of professional employees
pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
section 28 of this act by comparing the name of a professional
employee included in the showing of interest or written request, as
applicable, with the employment records of the state professional
employer.
2. A showing of interest filed by a professional organization
pursuant to section 27 or 28 of this act or a written request filed by
a group of professional employees pursuant to subparagraph (2)
of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of section 28 of this act is
confidential and is not a public record.
3. The Board shall not disclose to any person the identity of
any professional employee who has participated in a showing of
interest filed by a professional organization pursuant to section 27
or 28 of this act or a written request filed by a group of
-
*AB224_R2*

– 16 –
professional employees pursuant to subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of section 28 of this act.
Sec. 30. 1. If the Board orders an election within a
bargaining unit pursuant to section 28 or 31 of this act, the Board
shall order that each of the following be placed on the ballot for
the election:
(a) If applicable, a choice for the recognized professional
organization that requested the election pursuant to section 28 of
this act;
(b) If applicable, a choice for the recognized professional
organization that is currently designated as the exclusive
representative of the bargaining unit;
(c) A choice for any other recognized professional
organization that, on or before the date that is prescribed by the
rules adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 288.110 and section
31 of this act, files with the Board a written request to be placed on
the ballot for the election and includes with the written request a
showing of interest for that other professional organization by at
least 30 percent of the professional employees within the
bargaining unit; and
(d) A choice for “no exclusive representation.”
2. If a ballot for an election contains more than two choices
and none of the choices on the ballot receives a majority of the
votes cast at the initial election, the Board shall order a runoff
election between the two choices on the ballot that received the
highest number of votes at the initial election.
3. If the choice for “no exclusive representation” receives a
majority of the votes cast at the initial election or at any runoff
election, the Board shall designate the bargaining unit as being
without an exclusive representative.
4. If a recognized professional organization receives a
majority of the votes cast at the initial election or at any runoff
election, the Board shall designate that professional organization
as the exclusive representative of the bargaining unit.
Sec. 31. 1. The Board shall preside over all elections that
are conducted pursuant to this section or section 28 or 30 of this
act and shall determine the eligibility requirements for
professional employees to vote in any such election.
2. An election conducted pursuant to this section or section
28 or 30 of this act must be conducted by secret ballot. The Board
may adopt rules prescribing the manner in which voting in such
an election may be conducted, which may include, without
limitation, voting in person, by mail or by secure electronic means.
3. A professional organization that is placed as a choice on
the ballot for an election or any professional employee who is
-
*AB224_R2*

– 17 –
eligible to vote at an election may file with the Board a written
objection to the results of the election. The objection must be filed
not later than 10 business days after the date on which the notice
of the results of the election is given by the Board.
4. In response to a written objection filed pursuant to
subsection 3 or upon its own motion, the Board may invalidate the
results of an election and order a new election if the Board finds
that any conduct or circumstances raise substantial doubt that the
results of the election are reliable.
Sec. 32. 1. Each state professional employer that has
recognized one or more professional organizations shall, on or
before November 30 of each year, file with the Board:
(a) A list of each professional organization recognized by the
state professional employer;
(b) A list of each professional organization designated as the
exclusive representative for a bargaining unit within the state
professional employer; and
(c) A description of each bargaining unit within the state
professional employer.
2. Each professional organization recognized by a state
professional employer shall file a report with the Board on or
before November 30 of each year. The report must include:
(a) The full name of the professional organization;
(b) The name of each state professional employer which has
recognized the professional organization;
(c) The names of the officers of the professional organization;
(d) If applicable, the total number of professional employees in
each bargaining unit for which the professional organization has
been designated as the exclusive representative;
(e) Copies of all changes to the bylaws, charter or constitution
of the professional organization that were adopted during the
preceding year;
(f) The name, address and telephone number of the person
designated by the professional organization to receive
communications from the Board on business relating to the
professional organization; and
(g) A copy of any collective bargaining agreement in effect
between the professional organization and a state professional
employer.
3. A professional organization which has not previously been
recognized by a state professional employer shall file the report
required by subsection 2 not later than 30 calendar days after
recognition.
Sec. 33. 1. Collective bargaining entails a mutual
obligation between a state professional employer and an exclusive
-
*AB224_R2*

– 18 –
representative to meet at reasonable times and to bargain in good
faith with respect to:
(a) The subjects of mandatory bargaining set forth in
subsection 2;
(b) The negotiation of an agreement;
(c) The resolution of any question arising under an
agreement; and
(d) The execution of a written contract incorporating the
provisions of an agreement.
2. The scope of mandatory bargaining is limited to:
(a) Salary or wage rates or other forms of direct monetary
compensation.
(b) Sick leave.
(c) Vacation leave.
(d) Holidays.
(e) Maternity or paternity leave and family medical leave.
(f) Other paid or nonpaid leaves of absence.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, insurance
and health care benefits provided by the state professional
employer.
(h) Total hours of work required of a professional employee on
each workday or workweek.
(i) Total number of days of work required of a professional
employee in a work year.
(j) Discharge and disciplinary procedures.
(k) Recognition clause.
(l) The method for determining the classification and titles of
professional employees in the bargaining unit.
(m) Deduction of dues for the recognized professional
organization.
(n) Protection of professional employees in the bargaining unit
from discrimination because of participation in recognized
professional organizations consistent with the provisions of
sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act.
(o) Grievance and arbitration procedures for resolution of
disputes relating to interpretation or application of collective
bargaining agreements.
(p) General savings clauses.
(q) Except as otherwise provided in section 38 of this act, the
duration of collective bargaining agreements.
(r) Safety of professional employees.
(s) Facilities for meeting with students for professional
employees who have teaching or advising responsibilities.
(t) Policies for the transfer and reassignment of professional
employees.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 19 –
(u) Procedures for reduction in or addition to the workforce
consistent with the provisions of sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this
act.
3. The following are not subject to negotiation pursuant to
this section:
(a) Pension or retirement benefits provided by the Public
Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to chapter 286 of NRS to
persons employed by this State, state agencies, as described in
subsection 2 of NRS 286.070, and the Public Employees’
Retirement System.
(b) Benefits provided by the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program pursuant to NRS 287.0402 to 287.049, inclusive, to
persons employed by a participating state agency as defined in
NRS 287.04054.
(c) Provisions governing participation in the Public
Employees’ Deferred Compensation Program pursuant to NRS
287.250 to 287.370, inclusive.
4. The following are not subjects within the scope of
mandatory bargaining and are reserved to the state professional
employer without negotiation:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (t) of subsection
2, the right to hire, direct, assign or transfer an employee. This
right does not include the right to assign or transfer an employee
as a form of discipline.
(b) The right to determine the quality and quantity of services
to be offered to the public.
(c) Safety of the public.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of any collective
bargaining agreement negotiated pursuant to the provisions of
sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act, a state professional employer
is entitled to take whatever actions may be necessary to carry out
its responsibilities during a state of emergency or declaration of
disaster proclaimed pursuant to NRS 414.070. Those actions may
include the suspension of any such collective bargaining
agreement or any portion thereof for the duration of the
emergency or disaster to the extent necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the state professional employer. Any action
taken under the provisions of this subsection must not be
construed as a failure to negotiate in good faith.
6. This section does not preclude, but the provisions of
sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act, do not require, a state
professional employer to negotiate subject matters outside of the
scope of mandatory bargaining or consult with any professional
employee or professional organization on any such matter. A state
professional employer shall discuss subject matters outside the
-
*AB224_R2*

– 20 –
scope of mandatory bargaining but is not required to negotiate
those matters.
Sec. 34. 1. Whenever an exclusive representative or a state
professional employer desires to negotiate any matter which is
subject to negotiation pursuant to the provisions of sections 6 to
52, inclusive, of this act, it shall give written notice to the other
party.
2. The parties shall commence negotiations not later than 60
calendar days following the notification provided for in
subsection 1.
Sec. 35. 1. An exclusive representative shall:
(a) Act as the representative of all professional employees
within each bargaining unit that it represents; and
(b) In good faith and on behalf of each bargaining unit that it
represents, individually or collectively, bargain with a state
professional employer concerning the wages, hours and other
terms and conditions of employment for the professional
employees within each bargaining unit that it represents.
2. A professional organization may serve as an exclusive
representative for multiple bargaining units.
Sec. 36. 1. A state professional employer shall designate a
representative to conduct negotiations concerning collective
bargaining agreements on behalf of the state professional
employer. For the Nevada System of Higher Education, where a
bargaining unit has been determined pursuant to section 26 of this
act and that bargaining unit is unique to an institution within the
System, a representative of that institution may be, but is not
required to be, designated as the representative to conduct
negotiations concerning collective bargaining agreements on
behalf of the Nevada System of Higher Education for that
institution.
2. A representative designated pursuant to subsection 1 shall,
on behalf of the state professional employer, negotiate in good
faith with an exclusive representative concerning a collective
bargaining agreement, as required by section 33 of this act.
3. A state professional employer shall comply with reasonable
requests by an exclusive representative to furnish data that is
maintained in the ordinary course of business and which is
relevant and necessary to the discussion of the subjects of
mandatory bargaining described in section 33 of this act. This
subsection shall not be construed to require a state professional
employer to furnish to the exclusive representative any advice or
training received by representatives of the state professional
employer concerning collective bargaining.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 21 –
Sec. 37. 1. Each collective bargaining agreement
negotiated between a state professional employer and an exclusive
representative pursuant to sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act
must be in writing and must include, without limitation:
(a) A procedure to resolve grievances that applies to all
professional employees in the bargaining unit and culminates in
binding arbitration as the final stage of appeal by either party.
Such a procedure:
(1) Must be used to resolve all grievances relating to
employment, including, without limitation, the administration and
interpretation of the collective bargaining agreements, the
applicability of any law, rule or regulation relating to the
employment and appeal of discipline and other adverse personnel
actions; and
(2) May, for professional employees of academic
institutions, incorporate established shared governance
mechanisms, including, without limitation, oversight by a faculty
senate and peer review.
(b) A nonappropriation clause that provides that any provision
of the collective bargaining agreement which requires the
Legislature to appropriate money is effective only:
(1) To the extent of the legislative appropriation; and
(2) Until the collective bargaining agreement is reopened
and the provision is renegotiated.
2. A professional employee in a bargaining unit who is
aggrieved by the failure of the state professional employer or its
designated representative to comply with the requirements of NRS
281.755 may pursue a grievance related to that failure through:
(a) The procedure provided in the agreement pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1; or
(b) The procedure prescribed by NRS 288.115,
 but once the professional employee has properly filed a
grievance in writing under the procedure described in paragraph
(a) or filed a complaint under the procedure described in
paragraph (b), the professional employee may not proceed in an
alternative manner.
3. If there is a conflict between any provision of a collective
bargaining agreement between a state professional employer and
an exclusive representative and:
(a) Any policy, procedure or regulation adopted by the state
professional employer, the provision of the agreement prevails
unless the provision of the agreement is outside the lawful scope
of collective bargaining.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 22 –
(b) An existing statute, the provision of the agreement may not
be given effect unless the Legislature amends the existing statute
in such a way as to eliminate the conflict.
Sec. 38. If the parties to collective bargaining cannot agree
to a new collective bargaining agreement before the end of the
term of a collective bargaining agreement, the terms of the
existing collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until a
new collective bargaining agreement takes effect.
Sec. 39. Whenever a professional organization enters into
negotiations with a state professional employer pursuant to
sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act, the professional
organization may, at the sole expense of the professional
organization, be represented by an attorney licensed to practice
law in this State.
Sec. 40. 1. The draft of any new collective bargaining
agreement or similar agreement or of any proposed modifications
to an existing collective bargaining agreement or similar
agreement between a state professional employer and an exclusive
representative must be submitted in writing by the professional
organization to the members of the organization within the
relevant bargaining unit before a vote on the ratification of the
agreement is taken.
2. A vote on the ratification of a collective bargaining
agreement must be conducted in accordance with the internal
rules and procedures of the professional organization.
3. Any new or modified collective bargaining agreement or
similar agreement between a state professional employer and an
exclusive representative must be approved, at a public hearing, by:
(a) If the agreement concerns professional employees of the
Nevada System of Higher Education, the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada; or
(b) If the agreement does not concern professional employees
of the Nevada System of Higher Education, the State Board of
Examiners.
4. Not less than 3 business days before the date of the hearing
conducted pursuant to subsection 3, the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada or the State Board of Examiners, as
applicable, shall cause the following documents to be posted and
made available on the Internet website used by the Board of
Regents or the State Board of Examiners, as applicable, to provide
public notice of meetings:
(a) The proposed collective bargaining agreement and any
exhibits or other attachments to the proposed agreement;
-
*AB224_R2*

– 23 –
(b) If the proposed collective bargaining agreement is a
modification of a previous agreement, a document showing any
language added to or deleted from the previous agreement; and
(c) Any supporting material prepared for the Board of Regents
or the State Board of Examiners, as applicable, relating to the
financial impact of the agreement.
Sec. 41. If a provision of a collective bargaining agreement:
1. Does not require an act of the Legislature to be given
effect, the provision becomes effective in accordance with the
terms of the agreement.
2. Requires an act of the Legislature to be given effect:
(a) The state professional employer shall request that the
Governor request the drafting of a legislative measure pursuant to
NRS 218D.175 to effectuate the provision;
(b) The Governor shall request the drafting of a legislative
measure pursuant to NRS 218D.175 to effectuate the provision;
and
(c) The provisions become effective, if at all, on the date on
which the act of the Legislature becomes effective.
Sec. 42. 1. If a provision of a collective bargaining
agreement requires the Legislature to appropriate money to
implement the provision:
(a) The state professional employer that is a party to the
agreement shall include the full amount necessary to fund the
provision in the proposed budget of the state professional
employer submitted to the Chief of the Budget Division of the
Office of Finance pursuant to NRS 353.210.
(b) The Governor may include in the biennial proposed
executive budget of the State any amount of money the Governor
deems appropriate for the state professional employer. If such
amount is not sufficient to fully fund the provision of the collective
bargaining agreement, the Governor shall submit to the
Legislature and the state professional employer a statement setting
forth the reasons for not including the amount necessary to fully
fund the provision.
2. If the Legislature does not appropriate the amount of
money that is necessary to implement fully a provision of a
collective bargaining agreement, any such agreement may be
opened by either party to that agreement solely for the purpose of
renegotiating the provision that was not fully funded by the
appropriation. All other terms and conditions of the collective
bargaining agreement remain in full force and effect.
Sec. 43. 1. Either party may request mediation through the
Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service if the parties do not
reach a collective bargaining agreement:
-
*AB224_R2*

– 24 –
(a) Not later than 120 calendar days after the date on which
the parties began negotiations; or
(b) On or before any later date set by the agreement of the
parties in writing.
2. The mediator shall bring the parties together as soon as
possible after his or her appointment and shall attempt to settle
each issue in dispute not later than 21 calendar days after his or
her appointment or any later date set by the agreement of the
parties.
Sec. 44. 1. If a mediator appointed pursuant to section 43
of this act determines that his or her services are no longer
helpful, or if the parties do not reach a collective bargaining
agreement through mediation within 21 calendar days after the
appointment of the mediator or on or before any later date set by
agreement of the parties, the mediator shall discontinue mediation
and the parties shall attempt to agree upon an impartial arbitrator.
2. If the parties do not agree upon an impartial arbitrator
within 5 business days after the date on which mediation is
discontinued pursuant to subsection 1 or on or before any later
date set by agreement of the parties, the parties shall request from
the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service a list of seven
potential arbitrators. Not later than 5 business days after receipt of
the list of arbitrators, the parties shall select an arbitrator from the
list by alternately striking one name until the name of only one
arbitrator remains, and the parties must accept that arbitrator to
hear the dispute in question. The party who will strike the first
name must be determined by a coin toss.
3. The arbitrator shall begin arbitration proceedings not later
than 15 calendar days after the appointment or any later date set
by agreement of the parties.
4. The arbitrator and the parties shall apply and follow the
procedures for arbitration that are prescribed by any rules adopted
by the Board pursuant to NRS 288.110. During arbitration, the
parties retain their respective duties to negotiate in good faith.
5. The arbitrator may administer oaths or affirmations, take
testimony and issue and seek enforcement of a subpoena in the
same manner as the Board pursuant to NRS 288.120, and, except
as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the provisions of NRS
288.120 apply to any subpoena issued by the arbitrator.
6. The arbitrator shall render a decision not later than 15
calendar days after beginning arbitration proceedings or any later
date set by agreement of the parties.
7. The state professional employer and the exclusive
representative shall each pay one-half of the cost of arbitration.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 25 –
Sec. 45. 1. For issues in dispute after arbitration
proceedings are held pursuant to section 44 of this act, the
arbitrator shall incorporate either the final offer of the state
professional employer or the final offer of the exclusive
representative into his or her decision. The decision of the
arbitrator must be limited to a selection of one of the two final
offers of the parties. As incorporated in his or her decision, the
arbitrator shall not revise or amend the selected final offer of the
applicable party on any issue.
2. To determine which final offer to incorporate into his or
her decision, the arbitrator shall assess the reasonableness of:
(a) The position of each party as to each issue in dispute; and
(b) The proposed contractual terms and provisions contained
in each final offer.
3. In assessing reasonableness pursuant to subsection 2, the
arbitrator shall:
(a) Compare the salaries, wages, hours and other terms and
conditions of employment for the professional employees within
the bargaining unit with the salaries, wages, hours and other
terms and conditions of employment for other employees
performing similar services and for other employees generally:
(1) In public employment in comparable communities or
institutions; and
(2) In private employment in comparable communities or
institutions.
(b) Consider, without limitation:
(1) The financial ability of the state professional employer
to pay the costs associated with the proposed collective bargaining
agreement, with due regard for the primary obligation of the state
professional employer to safeguard the health, safety and welfare
of the people of this State and to fulfill the mission of the state
professional employer;
(2) Any legal or contractual restrictions on funds based on
the sources of those funds, including, without limitation,
legislative appropriations, fees, gifts and federal, state, local and
private grants and contracts;
(3) The average prices paid by consumers for goods,
services and housing in the geographic location where the
professional employees work; and
(4) Such other factors as are normally or traditionally used
as part of collective bargaining, mediation, arbitration or other
methods of dispute resolution to determine the wages, hours and
other terms and conditions of employment for professional
employees in public or private employment.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 26 –
4. The decision of the arbitrator is final and binding upon the
parties.
Sec. 46. The following proceedings, required by or conducted
pursuant to this chapter, are not subject to any provision of NRS
which requires a meeting to be open or public:
1. Any negotiation or informal discussion between a state
professional employer and a professional organization or
professional employees as individuals.
2. Any meeting of a mediator with either party or both parties
to a negotiation.
3. Any meeting or investigation conducted by a mediator or
arbitrator.
4. Any meeting of a state professional employer with its
management representative or representatives.
5. Deliberations of the Board toward a decision on a
complaint, appeal or petition for declaratory relief.
Sec. 47. 1. It is a prohibited practice for a state professional
employer or its designated representative to willfully:
(a) Interfere with, restrain or coerce any professional
employee in the exercise of any right guaranteed under the
provisions of sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act.
(b) Dominate, interfere or assist in the formation or
administration of any professional organization.
(c) Discriminate in regard to hiring, tenure or any term or
condition of employment to encourage or discourage membership
in any professional organization.
(d) Discharge or otherwise discriminate against any
professional employee because the professional employee has:
(1) Signed or filed an affidavit, petition or complaint or
given any information or testimony under this chapter; or
(2) Formed, joined or chosen to be represented by any
professional organization.
(e) Refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with an
exclusive representative as required by sections 33, 35 and 36 of
this act.
(f) Deny to any professional organization the rights
guaranteed to it under sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act.
(g) Discriminate because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, national
origin or because of political or personal reasons or affiliations.
(h) Fail to provide the data required by subsection 3 of section
36 of this act.
(i) Fail to comply with the requirements of NRS 281.755.
2. It is a prohibited practice for a professional organization
or its designated agent to willfully:
-
*AB224_R2*

– 27 –
(a) Interfere with, restrain or coerce any professional
employee in the exercise of any right guaranteed under the
provisions of sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act.
(b) If the professional organization is an exclusive
representative, refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with a
state professional employer, as required by sections 33, 35 and 36
of this act.
(c) Discriminate because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, national
origin or because of political or personal reasons or affiliations.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Bargain collectively” includes the entire bargaining
process, including mediation and arbitration, as provided in
sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act.
(b) “Protective hairstyle” includes, without limitation,
hairstyles such as natural hairstyles, afros, bantu knots, curls,
braids, locks and twists.
(c) “Race” includes traits associated with race, including,
without limitation, hair texture and protective hairstyles.
Sec. 48. 1. To establish that a party committed a prohibited
practice in violation of section 47 of this act, the party aggrieved
by the practice must file a complaint with the Board in accordance
with procedures prescribed by the Board.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Board
shall hear a complaint filed pursuant to subsection 1 in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 288.110 and any rules
adopted by the Board pursuant to that section.
3. The Board shall conduct any hearing on the complaint in
accordance with:
(a) The provisions of chapter 233B of NRS that apply to a
contested case; and
(b) Any rules adopted by the board pursuant to NRS 288.110.
4. If the Board finds at the hearing that the party accused in
the complaint has committed a prohibited practice, the Board:
(a) Shall order the party to cease and desist from engaging in
the prohibited practice; and
(b) May order any other affirmative relief that is necessary to
remedy the prohibited practice.
5. The Board or any party aggrieved by the failure of any
person to obey an order of the Board issued pursuant to
subsection 4 may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a
prohibitory or mandatory injunction to enforce the order.
6. Any order or decision issued by the Board pursuant to this
section concerning the merits of a complaint is a final decision in
a contested case and may be appealed pursuant to the provisions
-
*AB224_R2*

– 28 –
of chapter 233B of NRS that apply to a contested case, except that
a party aggrieved by the order or decision of the Board must file a
petition for judicial review not later than 10 business days after
being served with the order or decision of the Board.
Sec. 49. 1. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute,
a professional organization and a state professional employer may
sue or be sued as an entity pursuant to sections 6 to 52, inclusive,
of this act.
2. If any action or proceeding is brought by or against a
professional organization pursuant to sections 6 to 52, inclusive,
of this act, the district court in and for the county in which the
professional organization maintains its principal office or the
county in which the claim arose has jurisdiction over the claim.
3. A natural person and his or her assets are not subject to
liability for any judgment awarded pursuant to sections 6 to 52,
inclusive, of this act, against a state professional employer or a
professional organization.
Sec. 50. 1. On or before July 1 of each year, the Board
shall charge and collect a fee from each state professional
employer that has recognized one or more professional
organizations in an amount not to exceed $10 for each
professional employee who was, in the first pay period of the
immediately preceding fiscal year:
(a) Employed by the state professional employer; and
(b) In a bargaining unit that had an exclusive representative.
2. A state professional employer shall pay the fee imposed
pursuant to subsection 1 on or before July 31 of each year. A state
professional employer shall not impose the fee against its
employees.
3. If a state professional employer fails to pay the fee assessed
pursuant to subsection 1 on or before July 1 of that year, the
Board shall impose a civil penalty not to exceed $10 for each
professional employee employed by the state professional employer
for whom the fee was not paid.
4. A state professional employer may not receive a reduction
in the amount of the fee imposed pursuant to subsection 1 or a
refund of that amount if a professional employee is not employed
for a full calendar year. The fee must be imposed whether or not
the professional employee is a member of a professional
organization.
5. To carry out the provisions of this section, the Board may,
by any reasonable means, verify the identities and number of
professional employees employed by a state professional employer
in bargaining units that have an exclusive representative.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 29 –
Sec. 51. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a
state professional employer may use the services of the Division of
Human Resource Management of the Department of
Administration to provide support to the state professional
employer to carry out the provisions of sections 6 to 52, inclusive,
of this act.
2. If a state professional employer uses the services of the
Division of Human Resource Management pursuant to subsection
1, the Division may charge an annual fee to the state professional
employer for each professional employee who is within a
bargaining unit with a designated exclusive representative. The
state professional employer shall pay the annual fee to the
Division on or before the date on which the payment is due, as
specified by the Division. The Division may specify a different due
date for the annual fee for each state professional employer.
3. Any money received from the fees collected pursuant to
subsection 2 must be accounted for separately for each state
professional employer and may only be used by the Division of
Human Resource Management to provide support to the state
professional employer to carry out the provisions of sections 6 to
52, inclusive, of this act, including, without limitation, the
personnel and operating costs of the Division in providing such
support.
4. To carry out the provisions of this section, the Division of
Human Resource Management may verify by any reasonable
means the number of professional employees of the state
professional employer within bargaining units that are
represented by a professional organization as the exclusive
representative.
5. As the entity with the authority to fix salaries and establish
policies and procedures of the unclassified personnel of the
Nevada System of Higher Education pursuant to chapter 396 of
NRS, the Board of Regents of the University of Nevada shall carry
out the provisions of sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act,
including, without limitation:
(a) Conducting its own negotiations; and
(b) Providing for its own representation in any disciplinary
matter, investigation or grievance process,
 pursuant to the provisions of sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 52. 1. A state professional employer may use the
services of the Attorney General to provide support to the state
professional employer to carry out the provisions of sections 6 to
52, inclusive, of this act.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 30 –
2. If a state professional employer uses the services of the
Attorney General pursuant to subsection 1, the Attorney General
may charge the state professional employer for those services
pursuant to NRS 228.113.
Sec. 53. NRS 288.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.015 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 288.029 to 288.074,
inclusive, and sections 4 and 5 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 54. NRS 288.032 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.032 “Collective bargaining” means a method of
determining conditions of employment by negotiation between
representatives of the Executive Department , state professional
employer or local government employer and an employee
organization , professional organization or labor organization,
entailing a mutual obligation of the Executive Department , state
professional employer or local government employer, as applicable,
and the representative of the state or local government employees to
meet at reasonable times and bargain in good faith with respect to:
1. Wages, hours and other terms and conditions of
employment;
2. The negotiation of an agreement;
3. The resolution of any question arising under a negotiated
agreement; or
4. The execution of a written contract incorporating any
agreement reached if requested by either party,
 but this obligation does not compel either party to agree to a
proposal or require the making of a concession.
Sec. 55. NRS 288.065 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.065 “Mediation” means assistance by an impartial third
party to reconcile differences between the Executive Department , a
state professional employer or a local government employer and an
exclusive representative through interpretation, suggestion and
advice.
Sec. 56. NRS 288.074 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.074 “Strike” means any concerted:
1. Stoppage of work, slowdown or interruption of operations
by employees of the State of Nevada or local government
employees;
2. Absence from work by employees of the State of Nevada or
local government employees upon any pretext or excuse, such as
illness, which is not founded in fact; or
3. Interruption of the operations of the State of Nevada or any
local government employer by any employee organization ,
professional organization or labor organization.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 31 –
Sec. 57. NRS 288.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.080 1. The Government Employee-Management
Relations Board is hereby created, consisting of five members,
broadly representative of the public and not closely allied with any
employee organization, any professional organization, any labor
organization, the Executive Department , any state professional
employer or any local government employer.
2. Not more than three of the members of the Board may be
members of the same political party, and at least three of the
members must reside in southern Nevada. The term of office of each
member is 4 years.
3. The Governor shall appoint the members of the Board.
Sec. 58. NRS 288.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.090 1. The members of the Board shall annually elect
one of their number as Chair and one as Vice Chair. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, any three members of the Board
constitute a quorum, and a majority of a quorum present at any
meeting may exercise all the power and authority conferred on the
Board.
2. Except by a majority vote of the entire membership of the
Board, the Board may not:
(a) Elect a Chair or Vice Chair;
(b) Appoint the Commissioner or Secretary of the Board, or
terminate the employment of the Commissioner or Secretary;
(c) Adjust the fee charged to local government employers
pursuant to NRS 288.139 or impose a civil penalty for failure to pay
the fee;
(d) Make or adopt any rule or regulation; [or]
(e) Grant permission to a state professional employer to
withdraw recognition from a professional organization pursuant
to section 19 of this act; or
(f) Grant permission to a local government employer to
withdraw recognition from an employee organization or order an
election pursuant to NRS 288.160.
3. Whenever less than five members of the Board are present at
any meeting, not more than two of the members present may be
members of the same political party.
4. The Board may, within the limits of legislative
appropriations and any other available money:
(a) Appoint a Commissioner and a Secretary, who are in the
unclassified service of the State; and
(b) Employ such additional clerical personnel as may be
necessary, who are in the classified service of the State.
Sec. 59. NRS 288.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.110 1. The Board may make rules governing:
-
*AB224_R2*

– 32 –
(a) Proceedings before it;
(b) Procedures for fact-finding [;] , mediation and arbitration;
(c) The recognition, as defined in section 14 of this act, of
professional organizations;
(d) The recognition, as defined in NRS 288.136, of employee
organizations;
[(d)] (e) The designation of the exclusive representative, as
defined in section 10 of this act, of a bargaining unit of
professional employees in accordance with sections 27 to 31,
inclusive, of this act;
(f) The designation of the exclusive representative , as defined
in NRS 288.430, of a bargaining unit in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 288.520, 288.525 and 288.530; and
[(e)] (g) The determination of bargaining units.
2. The Board may hear and determine any complaint arising
out of the interpretation of, or performance under, the provisions of
this chapter by the Executive Department, any state professional
employer, any local government employer, any employee, as
defined in NRS 288.425, any professional employee, as defined in
section 13 of this act, any local government employee, any
employee organization , any professional organization or any labor
organization. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
NRS 288.115, 288.280 and 288.625 [,] and section 48 of this act,
the Board shall conduct a hearing within 180 days after it decides to
hear a complaint. If a complaint alleges a violation of paragraph (a)
of subsection 1 of NRS 288.620 , [or] paragraph (b) of subsection 2
of NRS 288.620, subsection 1 of section 47 of this act or
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of section 47 of this act, the Board
shall conduct a hearing not later than 45 days after it decides to hear
the complaint, unless the parties agree to waive this requirement.
The Board, after a hearing, if it finds that the complaint is well
taken, may order any person or entity to refrain from the action
complained of or to restore to the party aggrieved any benefit of
which the party has been deprived by that action. Except when an
expedited hearing is conducted pursuant to NRS 288.115, the Board
shall issue its decision within 120 days after the hearing on the
complaint is completed.
3. Any party aggrieved by the failure of any person to obey an
order of the Board issued pursuant to subsection 2, or the Board at
the request of such a party, may apply to a court of competent
jurisdiction for a prohibitory or mandatory injunction to enforce the
order.
4. The Board may not consider any complaint or appeal filed
more than 6 months after the occurrence which is the subject of the
complaint or appeal.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 33 –
5. The Board may decide without a hearing a contested matter:
(a) In which all of the legal issues have been previously decided
by the Board, if it adopts its previous decision or decisions as
precedent; or
(b) Upon agreement of all the parties.
6. The Board may award reasonable costs, which may include
attorneys’ fees, to the prevailing party.
7. As used in this section [, “bargaining unit”] :
(a) “Arbitration” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
288.410 or section 7 of this act, as applicable.
(b) “Bargaining unit” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
288.134 or 288.415 [.] or section 8 of this act, as applicable.
Sec. 60. NRS 288.710 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.710 1. If a strike is commenced or continued in violation
of an order issued pursuant to NRS 288.705, the court may:
(a) Punish each employee organization , professional
organization or labor organization guilty of such violation by a fine
of not more than $50,000 against each employee organization ,
professional organization or labor organization for each day of
continued violation.
(b) Punish any officer of an employee organization ,
professional organization or labor organization who is wholly or
partly responsible for such violation by a fine of not more than
$1,000 for each day of continued violation, or by imprisonment as
provided in NRS 22.110.
(c) Punish any employee of the State or of a local government
employer who participates in such strike by ordering the dismissal
or suspension of such employee.
2. Any of the penalties enumerated in subsection 1 may be
applied alternatively or cumulatively, in the discretion of the court.
Sec. 61. NRS 218D.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.175 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
for a regular session, the Governor or the Governor’s designated
representative may request the drafting of not more than 110
legislative measures which have been approved by the Governor or
the Governor’s designated representative on behalf of the officers,
agencies, boards, commissions, departments and other units of the
Executive Department. The requests must be submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before August 1 preceding the regular
session.
2. The Governor or the Governor’s designated representative
may request at any time before or during a regular session, without
limitation, the drafting of as many legislative measures as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 288.400 to 288.630,
inclusive [.] , or sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 34 –
3. The Director of the Office of Finance may request on or
before the 19th day of a regular session, without limitation, the
drafting of as many legislative measures as are necessary to
implement the budget proposed by the Governor and to provide for
the fiscal management of the State. In addition to the requests
otherwise authorized pursuant to this section, the Governor may
request the drafting of not more than 5 legislative measures on or
before the 19th day of a regular session to propose the Governor’s
legislative agenda.
4. For a regular session, the following constitutional officers
may request, without the approval of the Governor or the
Governor’s designated representative, the drafting of not more than
the following numbers of legislative measures, which must be
submitted to the Legislative Counsel on or before September 1
preceding the regular session:

Lieutenant Governor ............................................................... 3
Secretary of State .................................................................... 6
State Treasurer ........................................................................ 5
State Controller ....................................................................... 5
Attorney General .................................................................. 20

5. In addition to the requests authorized by subsection 4, the
Secretary of State may request, without the approval of the
Governor or the Governor’s designated representative, the drafting
of not more than 2 legislative measures, which must be submitted to
the Legislative Counsel on or before December 31 preceding the
regular session.
6. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel. The legislative
measures requested pursuant to subsections 1 and 4 must be prefiled
on or before the third Wednesday in November preceding the
regular session. A legislative measure that is not prefiled on or
before that day shall be deemed withdrawn.
Sec. 62. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
-
*AB224_R2*

– 35 –
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 172.075, 172.245, 176.015,
176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156, 176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715,
178.5691, 179.495, 179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 200.3771,
200.3772, 200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392,
209.3923, 209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140,
213.010, 213.040, 213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464,
217.475, 218A.350, 218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240,
218G.350, 224.240, 226.300, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300, 239.0105,
239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040, 239B.050,
239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270, 239C.420,
240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264, 244.335,
247.540, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130, 250.140, 250.150,
268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910, 269.174, 271A.105, 281.195,
281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680, 281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755,
281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086, 286.110, 286.118, 287.0438,
289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830, 293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503,
293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870, 293.906, 293.908, 293.910,
293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110, 332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335,
338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593, 338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420,
349.597, 349.775, 353.205, 353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100,
353C.240, 360.240, 360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242,
361.610, 365.138, 366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080,
378.290, 378.300, 379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830,
385B.100, 387.626, 387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503,
388.513, 388.750, 388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035,
391.0365, 391.120, 391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271,
392.315, 392.317, 392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045,
394.167, 394.16975, 394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465,
396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143, 396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525,
396.535, 396.9685, 398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888,
408.5484, 412.153, 414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305,
422A.342, 422A.350, 425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 432.028,
432.205, 432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407,
432B.430, 432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534,
433A.360, 439.4941, 439.4988, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 447.345, 449.209,
449.245, 449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805,
453.164, 453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555,
459.7056, 459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403,
463.3407, 463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940,
481.063, 481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340,
-
*AB224_R2*

– 36 –
483.363, 483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830,
484B.833, 484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040,
534A.031, 561.285, 571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098,
598A.110, 598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303,
604A.710, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315, 616B.350,
618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137, 624.110,
624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671, 630.2672,
630.2673, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327, 630A.555, 631.332,
631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415, 632.3423, 632.405, 633.283,
633.301, 633.4715, 633.4716, 633.4717, 633.524, 634.055,
634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169, 634A.185, 635.111, 635.158,
636.262, 636.342, 637.085, 637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087,
638.089, 639.183, 639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185,
640A.220, 640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620,
640C.745, 640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340,
641.090, 641.221, 641.2215, 641.325, 641A.191, 641A.217,
641A.262, 641B.170, 641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760,
641D.260, 641D.320, 642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180,
645.625, 645A.050, 645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220,
645C.225, 645D.130, 645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330,
647.0945, 647.0947, 648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126,
652.228, 653.900, 654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130,
665.133, 669.275, 669.285, 669A.310, 671.170, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and sections 29 and 46 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41
of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter
391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law
to be confidential, all public books and public records of a
governmental entity must be open at all times during office hours to
inspection by any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or
memorandum may be prepared from those public books and public
records. Any such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to
supply the general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the
records or may be used in any other way to the advantage of the
governmental entity or of the general public. This section does not
supersede or in any manner affect the federal laws governing
copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in any other manner the
-
*AB224_R2*

– 37 –
rights of a person in any written book or record which is
copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 63. NRS 241.016 is hereby amended to read as follows:
241.016 1. The meetings of a public body that are quasi-
judicial in nature are subject to the provisions of this chapter.
2. The following are exempt from the requirements of this
chapter:
(a) The Legislature of the State of Nevada.
(b) Judicial proceedings, including, without limitation,
proceedings before the Commission on Judicial Selection and,
-
*AB224_R2*

– 38 –
except as otherwise provided in NRS 1.4687, the Commission on
Judicial Discipline.
(c) Meetings of the State Board of Parole Commissioners when
acting to grant, deny, continue or revoke the parole of a prisoner or
to establish or modify the terms of the parole of a prisoner.
3. Any provision of law, including, without limitation, NRS
91.270, 219A.210, 228.495, 239C.140, 239C.420, 241.028,
281A.350, 281A.690, 281A.735, 281A.760, 284.3629, 286.150,
287.0415, 287.04345, 287.338, 288.220, 288.590, 289.387, 295.121,
315.98425, 360.247, 388.261, 388.385, 388A.495, 388C.150,
388D.355, 388G.710, 388G.730, 392.147, 392.466, 392.467,
392.4671, 394.1699, 396.1415, 396.3295, 414.270, 422.405,
433.534, 435.610, 442.774, 463.110, 480.545, 622.320, 622.340,
630.311, 630.336, 631.3635, 639.050, 642.518, 642.557, 686B.170,
696B.550, 703.196 and 706.1725 [,] and section 46 of this act,
which:
(a) Provides that any meeting, hearing or other proceeding is not
subject to the provisions of this chapter; or
(b) Otherwise authorizes or requires a closed meeting, hearing
or proceeding,
 prevails over the general provisions of this chapter.
4. The exceptions provided to this chapter, and electronic
communication, must not be used to circumvent the spirit or letter of
this chapter to deliberate or act, outside of an open and public
meeting, upon a matter over which the public body has supervision,
control, jurisdiction or advisory powers.
Sec. 64. NRS 396.251 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.251 1. The Board of Regents may establish policies and
procedures for personnel which govern student employees,
physicians engaged in a program for residency training and
postdoctoral fellows of the System and which are separate from the
policies and procedures established for the unclassified personnel of
the System. Any such policy or procedure does not diminish the
eligibility of those persons for coverage as employees under the
provisions of chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of
NRS.
2. Except as otherwise provided in sections 6 to 52, inclusive,
of this act:
(a) In establishing policies and procedures pursuant to
subsection 1, the Board of Regents is not bound by any of the other
provisions of this chapter or the provisions of title 23 of NRS.
[Those]
(b) The provisions of this chapter and the provisions of title 23
of NRS do not apply to a student employee, a physician engaged in
-
*AB224_R2*

– 39 –
a program for residency training or a postdoctoral fellow of the
System unless otherwise provided by the Board of Regents.
3. In the event of a conflict between the policies and
procedures established pursuant to subsection 1 and the provisions
of a collective bargaining agreement entered into pursuant to
sections 6 to 52, inclusive, of this act, the provisions of the
agreement prevail.
Sec. 65. NRS 396.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.280 The Board of Regents shall have [the] :
1. The power to fix the salaries of the academic staff of the
System.
2. The authority to conduct collective bargaining negotiations
and to enter into collective bargaining agreements with the
professional employees of the System pursuant to sections 6 to 52,
inclusive, of this act to establish the terms and conditions of
employment of the academic staff and other professional
employees of the System. As used in this subsection, “professional
employee” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 13 of this act.
Sec. 65.3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee for allocation to the
Nevada System of Higher Education for personnel and operating
expenses associated with the changes relating to collective
bargaining in this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 .................................. $600,671
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 ............................... $1,290,630
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively.
Sec. 65.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee for allocation to the
Office of the Attorney General for personnel, operating and
information services expenses associated with the changes relating
to collective bargaining in this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 .................................. $181,380
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 .................................. $230,755
-
*AB224_R2*

– 40 –
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before September
20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively.
Sec. 66. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
insofar as they conflict with the provisions of such an agreement,
the amendatory provisions of this act do not apply during the current
term of any collective bargaining agreement entered into before
July 1, 2023, but do apply to any extension or renewal of such an
agreement and to any such agreement entered into on or after July 1,
2023.
2. If a collective bargaining agreement entered into before
July 1, 2023, has a provision authorizing the reopening of
negotiations, the amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to
the reopened negotiations of the provisions of that collective
bargaining agreement if a renegotiated collective bargaining
agreement is entered into before January 1, 2024.
3. If a state professional employer has established a bargaining
unit for any of its professional employees or has designated a
professional organization as the exclusive representative for a
bargaining unit as of July 1, 2023, such bargaining unit or exclusive
representative shall be deemed the bargaining unit or exclusive
representative representing the same professional employees on and
after July 1, 2023, until such time, if any, the bargaining unit or
exclusive representative is changed or modified in accordance with
the provisions of this act.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Bargaining unit” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 8
of this act.
(b) “Exclusive representative” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 10 of this act.
(c) “Professional employee” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 13 of this act.
(d) “Professional organization” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 4 of this act.
(e) “State professional employer” has the meaning ascribed to it
in section 5 of this act.
-
*AB224_R2*

– 41 –
Sec. 67. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
H
-
*AB224_R2*